Georgia, session 2025_26, HB908.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Subpart 2 of Part 1 of Article 16 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia
Annotated, relating to compulsory attendance in elementary and secondary education, is
amended in Code Section 20-2-690.1, relating to mandatory education for children between
ages six and 16, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, mandatory
Mandatory attendance in a public school, private school, or home school program shall
be required for children between their sixth and sixteenth birthdays.
H. B. 908
- 1 -

LC 60 0176
(2) Mandatory Such mandatory attendance shall not be required where the child has for
children between their sixth and sixteenth birthdays who have successfully completed all
requirements for a high school diploma. No child who is in his or her final semester of
high school shall be required to take or attend classes for any course or courses beyond
the minimum coursework necessary for a high school diploma."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 908
- 2 -